Arkansas statutes. Title 11 Labor and Industrial Relations
Chapter 10 Division of Workforce Services Law
Subchapter 2
— Definitions

Effective Dates.

Acts 1943, No. 110, § 2: effective on adoption. Approved Feb. 26, 1943.

Acts 1949, No. 129, § 2: Feb. 21, 1949. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby ascertained and declared that a grave injustice is being done by compelling payment of Unemployment Compensation Tax on real estate commission salesmen where no benefits can be derived from same and this unjust situation should be corrected immediately and an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1955, No. 395, § 30: July 1, 1955.

Acts 1963, No. 93, § 13: July 1, 1963.

Acts 1971, No. 35, § 25: approved Feb. 3, 1971. Emergency clause provided: “It is determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that an unemployment crisis exists in this State and in order to give better protection to the unemployed and their families extended benefits of the unemployment insurance program should be made available and to alleviate as much as possible the suffering and distress caused by unemployment, it is necessary to work in cooperation with the federal government; and in order to receive the benefits of federal law and comply with the mandate of the United State Congress as provided in United States Public Law 91-373, an emergency is hereby declared and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, this Act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1973, No. 329, § 14: Mar. 14, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that various provisions of the Employment Security laws of the State are in need of immediate clarification and revision in order to provide adequate protection to the working and unemployed citizens of this State and that this Act is immediately necessary to accomplish this purpose. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975, No. 609, § 19: Mar. 28, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that various provisions of the Arkansas Employment Security Law of the State are in need of immediate clarification and revision in order to provide adequate protection to the working and unemployed citizens of this State and that this Act is immediately necessary to accomplish this purpose. An emergency is, therefore, declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1083, § 14: Jan. 30, 1976. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that various provisions of the Arkansas Employment Security Law of the State of Arkansas are in need of immediate clarification and revision in order to provide adequate protection to the citizens of this State when they experience a period of unemployment and that this Act is immediately necessary to accomplish this purpose. An emergency is, therefore, declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1977, No. 366, § 14: Mar. 17, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that various provisions of the Arkansas Employment Security Law of the State are in need of immediate clarification and revision in order to provide adequate protection to the employed and unemployed citizens of this State and that this Act is immediately necessary to accomplish this purpose. An emergency is, therefore, declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1977, No. 376, § 21: approved Mar. 8, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to receive the benefits of Federal law and to comply with the mandate of the United States Congress as provided in United States Public Law 94-566 and in order to give better protection to the unemployed workers and their families, an emergency is hereby declared and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, this Act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1979, No. 492, § 18: Mar. 21, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to clarify certain provisions of the Employment Security Law that may be subject to misinterpretation and in order to bring the said Employment Security Law into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act as amended by P. L. 94-566, P. L. 95-19, and P. L. 95-216 so that Arkansas employers and workers may receive the benefits of the said Federal Unemployment Tax Act, an emergency is hereby declared and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall take effect and be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1979, No. 922, § 18: Apr. 16, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to clarify certain provisions of the Employment Security Law into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act as amended by P. L. 94-566, P. L. 95-19, and P. L. 95-216 so that Arkansas employers and workers may receive the benefits of the said Federal Unemployment Tax Act, an emergency is hereby declared and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall take effect and be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981, No. 43, § 22: Feb. 10, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to restore and insure solvency to the State's unemployment insurance trust fund from which unemployment benefits are paid to unemployed Arkansas workers and in order to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law in conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act as amended by P.L. 96-364 and P.L. 96-499 and with P.L. 95-524, 96-249 and 96-265 so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and that Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed, an emergency is hereby declared and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect and be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1983, No. 482, § 41: Mar. 16, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to conform with P.L. 97-300 and to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law in conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act as amended by P.L. 97-248 and to insure the future solvency of the unemployment insurance fund so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and that Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed, an emergency is hereby declared and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect and be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1985, Nos. 8,9, § 34: Jan. 30, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended by P.L. 98-21 and P.L. 98-369, so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and that Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed, an emergency is hereby declared and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect and be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 672, § 13: Apr. 7, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that because of the case Ricarte v. State, CR 86-31, a question has arisen over the validity of Act 1083 of the Extended Session of 1976; that this Act is a reenactment of the former law; and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to clarify the state of the law on this issue. Therefore, an emergency is hereby delared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 753, § 30: July 1, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to correct certain inequities in the payment and in the denial of benefits to unemployed workers, to make needed technical corrections to the Shared Work plan provisions which enable employers to avoid layoffs and to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and that Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed, an emergency is hereby declared and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect and be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 1987.”

Acts 1989, No. 420, § 17: Mar. 8, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to correct certain inequities in the payment and in the denial of benefits to unemployed workers, to make needed technical corrections, and to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and that Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect and be in full force after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 48, § 13: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to correct certain inequities in the payment and in the denial of benefits to unemployed workers, to make needed technical corrections and to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and that Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed, an emergency is hereby declared and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect and be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 1991, No. 100, § 58: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the provisions of this act should become effective at the beginning of the next fiscal year; that the next fiscal year begins on July 1, 1991 and this act may not go into effect until after July 1, 1991 unless an emergency is declared. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 1993, No. 6, § 21: Feb. 1, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to correct certain inequities in the payment and in the denial of benefits to unemployed workers, to make needed technical corrections and to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and that Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1995, No. 519, § 14: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to correct certain inequities in the payment and in the denial of benefits to unemployed workers, to make needed technical corrections and to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and the Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 1995, No. 581, § 5: Mar. 9, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that newspaper carriers have traditionally been considered to be independent contractors; that the Employment Security Department's interpretation of the laws concerning independent contractors has called into question whether many newspaper carriers are employees or independent contractors; that many small newspapers will be harmed, if newspaper carriers are interpreted to be employees; that this act exempts newspaper carriers from employment status; that this act is immediately necessary in order to preserve the independent contractor status of newspaper carriers and to avoid unnecessary harm to newspaper companies. Therefore an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect upon passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 234, § 32: Feb. 21, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that in order to correct certain inequities in the payment and in the denial of benefits to unemployed workers, to make needed technical corrections and to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and the Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1999, No. 1116, § 19: Apr. 5, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that in order to correct certain inequities in the payment and in the denial of benefits to unemployed workers, to make needed technical corrections and to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and the Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2001, No. 1467, § 7: Apr. 10, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-third General Assembly that this act should go into effect as soon as possible in order to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and the Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2003, No. 353, § 3: Mar. 13, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act should go into effect as soon as possible in order to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and the Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2003, No. 1223, § 15: Apr. 10, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act should go into effect as soon as possible in order to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Department into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2009, No. 802, § 14: Apr. 3, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act should go into effect as soon as possible in order to assure the prompt determination of claims for unemployment benefits and the continued provision of benefits and services to eligible persons. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 1180, § 2: Apr. 12, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that ElderChoices clients are among the state's most vulnerable citizens; that ElderChoices personal services caregivers provide essential assistance to ElderChoices clients to help them remain healthy and to keep them in their homes and out of institutions; that personal care services caregivers for ElderChoices clients are jeopardized by recent decisions by the Department of Workforce Services regarding the employment status of personal care services caregivers. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2015, No. 945, § 2: Apr. 2, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that employers struggle to create and expand businesses in our sluggish economy; that developing the state's workforce is the most effective route to economic growth; and that this act is immediately necessary because lost time in meeting the business crisis may set Arkansas at a disadvantage in the regional economy. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2017, No. 1115, § 2: Jan. 1, 2018.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

11-10-201. Base period.

As used in this chapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise, “base period” means the first four (4) of the last five (5) completed calendar quarters immediately preceding the first day of the benefit year.

For claims involving wages of several states, the base period shall be that which is applicable under the unemployment insurance laws of the paying state.

If an individual lacks sufficient base-period wages because of a job-related injury for which he or she received workers' compensation, an extended base period will be substituted for the current base period on a quarter-by-quarter basis as needed to establish a valid claim upon written application by the claimant.

“Extended base period” means the four (4) quarters prior to the claimant's base period. These four (4) quarters may be substituted for base period quarters on a quarter-by-quarter basis to establish a valid claim regardless of whether the wages have been used to establish a prior claim, except that any wages earned that would render the Division of Workforce Services out of compliance with applicable federal law will be excluded if used in a prior claim.

Benefits paid on the basis of an extended base period, which would not otherwise be payable, shall be noncharged.

Beginning with initial claims filed on July 1, 2009, and thereafter, if an individual lacks sufficient base-period wages, an alternate base period shall be substituted for the current base period.

“Alternate base period” means the four (4) completed calendar quarters immediately preceding the first day of that benefit year.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 2; 1947, No. 398, § 1; 1973, No. 350, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1103; Acts 1997, No. 234, § 2; 2009, No. 802, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 178.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Workforce Services” for “Department of Workforce Services” in (b)(2).

11-10-202. Regular benefits.

As used in this chapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise, “regular benefits” means benefits payable to an individual under this chapter or under any other state law, including benefits payable to federal civilian employees and to ex-servicemen pursuant to 5 U.S.C. § 8501 et seq., other than extended benefits and additional benefits.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 2; 1971, No. 35, § 1; 1973, No. 350, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1103.

11-10-203. Benefit year.

As used in this chapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise, “benefit year” with respect to any individual means the twelve-consecutive-month period beginning the first day of the calendar quarter in which he or she first files a valid claim for benefits in accordance with § 11-10-521. For claims involving the wages of several states, the benefit year shall be that which is applicable under the unemployment insurance law of the paying state.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 2; 1947, No. 398, § 1; 1973, No. 350, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1103.

11-10-204. Contributions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

“Contributions” means money payments required by this chapter to be made into the Unemployment Compensation Fund by any employing unit on account of having individuals in its employ; and

“Payments in lieu of contributions” means the money payments made pursuant to the provisions of § 11-10-713.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 2; 1973, No. 350, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1103.

11-10-205. Calendar quarter.

As used in this chapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise, “calendar quarter” means the period of three (3) consecutive calendar months ending on March 31, June 30, September 30, or December 31.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1103.

11-10-206. Director.

As used in this chapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise, “director” means the Director of the Division of Workforce Services.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 2; 1955, No. 395, § 1; 1977, No. 366, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1103; Acts 1991, No. 100, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 179.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services”.

11-10-207. Rules.

All rules previously promulgated under this chapter shall be enforceable by the Director of the Division of Workforce Services and shall remain in full force and effect unless or until such time as amended by the director.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 2; 1955, No. 395, § 1; 1977, No. 366, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1103; Acts 1991, No. 100, § 3; 2019, No. 315, § 803; 2019, No. 910, § 180.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “Rules” for “Regulations” in the section heading and in the text.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services”.

11-10-208. Employing unit.

As used in this chapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise, “employing unit” means any individual, organization, or legal representative of a deceased person.

This term includes but is not limited to any partnership, association, trust, estate, joint-stock company, insurance company, or corporation, whether domestic or foreign, and the receiver, trustee in bankruptcy, trustee, or successor of any of the foregoing which has had one (1) or more individuals performing services for it within this state.

“Employing unit” shall also mean the state or any agency, board, commission, department, institution, or instrumentality of the state and any political subdivision of the state and any instrumentality of any political subdivision of the state, any instrumentality of more than one (1) of the foregoing, any instrumentality of the foregoing and one (1) or more other states or political subdivisions, which has had one (1) or more individuals performing services for it.

All individuals performing services within this state for any employing unit which maintains two (2) or more separate establishments within this state shall be deemed to be performing services for a single employing unit for all the purposes of this chapter.

Each individual employed to perform or to assist in performing the work of any person in the service of an employing unit shall be deemed to be engaged by the employing unit for all the purposes of this chapter, whether the individual was hired or paid directly by the employing unit or the person, provided that the employing unit had actual or constructive knowledge of the work.

Any employer may on or before December 1 prior to the year the application is to become effective make application in writing to the Division of Workforce Services to participate in a joint account with one (1) or more other employers.

The division shall approve those applications that meet the requirements of this section.

Any application to participate in a joint account may be filed on or before December 1 prior to the year the membership is to become effective, provided, however, all contributions, interest, and penalties due from the applicant-employer must be paid prior to the effective date of the employer's membership in the joint account.

All such applications shall be accepted only on the condition that the applicant waive all rights he or she has in his or her individual employer account under the law when the division approves his or her application and merges his or her individual account into a joint account for experience-rating purposes.

Each applicant-employer shall agree to assume joint and several liability for any contributions, interest, and penalties accruing on the part of any one (1) of the employers participating in the joint account during the duration of the account in consideration for the division's granting the applicant-employer the right to participate in it.

Each employer participating in a joint account agrees to maintain a sufficient record of the employee's own employment in order that the employer can furnish the division with information necessary to enable the division to make proper certification to the Internal Revenue Service under the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and to enable the division to determine any benefit charges against the employee's separate account.

No reduced rate of contributions shall be established for any joint account until each participating employer is individually eligible for the calculation of a contribution rate.

All joint accounts will be maintained only on a calendar-year basis, and joint accounts must be maintained for a minimum period of two (2) calendar years unless terminated sooner by action of the division.

All contribution credits for all employers in a joint account will be calculated together. All benefit payments chargeable against all employers in a joint account will be calculated together. The average annual payroll of the joint account will be the average of the annual payrolls of all employers participating in the account.

If any individual, type of organization, or employing unit succeeds to the business of an employer participating in a joint account under conditions which would require the transfer of any separate account of that employer to the successor, the successor shall be ipso facto a member of the joint account.

Withdrawal from a joint account by any participating employer may be approved if the request for withdrawal is made in writing to the division on or before September 30 of the year prior to the year for which the withdrawal is to be effective.

The withdrawing employer shall as of the effective date of withdrawal be treated in all respects as a newly liable employer regardless of all prior contributions or benefit payment experience.

The remaining employer or employers shall continue to constitute the joint account. The withdrawal or termination of all except one (1) member shall not dissolve such joint account unless and until such last member shall withdraw or terminate.

Participation in a joint account shall not affect the right of any employer to terminate the employer's liability, but after termination, the employer shall in all respects be treated as a withdrawing employer under this section.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 2; 1971, No. 35, § 2; 1977, No. 376, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1103; Acts 1997, No. 234, § 3; 2019, No. 910, § 181.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Workforce Services” for “Department of Workforce Services” in (c)(1); and substituted “division” for “department” throughout (c).

U.S. Code.

The reference to the Federal Unemployment Tax Act may be to the Federal Unemployment Tax Act of 1939 or the Federal Unemployment Tax Act of 1954. Both are codified as 26 U.S.C. § 3301 et seq.

11-10-209. Employer.

As used in this chapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise, “employer” means:

Any individual or employing unit which, for some portion of ten (10) or more days, whether the days are or were consecutive, within the current or the preceding calendar year, has or had in employment one (1) or more individuals irrespective of whether the same individuals are or were employed in each day;

Any employing unit for which service in employment as defined in § 11-10-210(a)(2) is performed, except as provided in subdivision (5) of this section;

Any employing unit which is a nonprofit organization and for which service in employment includes, but is not limited to, service in employment as defined in § 11-10-210(a)(5), except as provided in subdivisions (4)(B) and (5)(B) of this section;

Any employing unit for which agricultural labor as defined in § 11-10-210(a)(5) is performed.

In determining whether or not an employing unit for which service other than agricultural labor is also performed is an employer under subdivisions (1)-(3) or subdivision (5)(A) of this section, the wages earned or the employment of an employee performing service in agricultural labor shall not be taken into account. If an employing unit is determined an employer of agricultural labor, the employing unit shall be determined an employer for the purposes of subdivision (1) of this section;

Any employing unit for which domestic service in employment as defined in § 11-10-210(a)(6) is performed.

In determining whether or not an employing unit for which service other than domestic service is also performed is an employer under subdivisions (1)-(3) or subdivision (4)(A) of this section, the wages earned or the employment of an employee performing domestic service shall not be taken into account;

Any individual or employing unit which acquired the organization, trade, or business, or substantially all of the assets thereof, of another which at the time of the acquisition was an employer subject to this chapter;

Any individual or employing unit that acquired the organization, trade, or business, or substantially all the assets thereof, of another employing unit, if the employment record of the individual or employing unit subsequent to the acquisition, together with the employment record of the acquired unit prior to the acquisition, both within the same calendar year, would be sufficient to constitute an employing unit an employer under subdivision (1) of this section;

Any employing unit not an employer by reason of any other subdivision of this section:

For which, within either the current or preceding calendar year, service is or was performed with respect to which the employing unit is liable for any federal tax against which credit may be taken for contributions required to be paid into a state unemployment fund; or

Which, as a condition for approval of this chapter for full tax credit against the tax imposed by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, is required pursuant to the act to be an employer under this chapter;

For the effective period of its election pursuant to § 11-10-403, any employing unit which has elected to become subject to this chapter; and

For the purposes of subdivisions (1) and (3) of this section, employment shall include service that would constitute employment but for the fact that the service is deemed to be performed entirely within another state pursuant to an election under an arrangement entered into, in accordance with § 11-10-544(a), by the Director of the Division of Workforce Services and any agency charged with the administration of any other state or federal unemployment compensation law.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 2; 1971, No. 35, § 2; 1973, No. 329, § 1; 1977, No. 366, § 2; 1977, No. 376, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1103; Acts 2011, No. 980, § 4; 2019, No. 910, § 182.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment inserted present (4)(B); redesignated former (4)(B) as (5)(A) and former (5)(A) as (5)(B); and deleted former (5)(B).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (10).

U.S. Code.

The Federal Unemployment Tax Act referred to in this section is codified as 26 U.S.C. § 3301 et seq.